Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.0301

Capital budget instructions—Additional information—Staff support from office of community development.

(1) The office of financial management must include in its capital budget instructions a request for "yes" or "no" answers for the following additional informational questions from capital budget applicants for all proposed major capital construction projects valued over $10,000,000 and required to complete a predesign:

(a) For proposed capital projects identified in this subsection that are located in or serving city or county planning under RCW 36.70A.040:

(i) Whether the proposed capital project is identified in the host city or county comprehensive plan, including the capital facility plan, and implementing rules adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW;

(ii) Whether the proposed capital project is located within an adopted urban growth area:

(A) If at all located within an adopted urban growth area boundary, whether a project facilitates, accommodates, or attracts planned population and employment growth;

(B) If at all located outside an urban growth area boundary, whether the proposed capital project may create pressures for additional development;

(b) For proposed capital projects identified in this subsection that are requesting state funding:

(i) Whether there was regional coordination during project development;

(ii) Whether local and additional funds were leveraged;

(iii) Whether environmental outcomes and the reduction of adverse environmental impacts were examined.

(2) For projects subject to subsection (1) of this section, the office of financial management shall request the required information be provided during the predesign process of major capital construction projects to reduce long-term costs and increase process efficiency.

(3) The office of financial management, in fulfilling its duties under RCW 43.88.030(6) to create a capital budget document, must take into account information gathered under subsections (1) and (2) of this section in an effort to promote state capital facility expenditures that minimize unplanned or uncoordinated infrastructure and development costs, support economic and quality of life benefits for existing communities, and support local government planning efforts.

(4) The office of community development must provide staff support to the office of financial management and affected capital budget applicants to help collect data required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

(5) The office of financial management must include in its capital budget instructions, beginning with the instructions for the 2025-2027 biennium, information informing awarding authorities, as defined in RCW 39.116.010, of the requirements of chapter 39.116 RCW, including the data and information requirements in RCW 39.116.020.

[ 2024 c 344 s 7; 2021 c 54 s 4; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 2; 2002 c 312 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Short title—2024 c 344: See RCW 39.116.005 and 39.116.900.

Findings—Intent—2021 c 54: See note following RCW 43.88.110.